test/src/morphology/N-fakt_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - fakt: # Noun 135 'eng /est fakt/fin' - full paradigm
     fakt+N+Sg+Nom: fakt
     fakt+N+Sg+Gen: fakt
     fakt+N+Sg+Par: faktõ
     fakt+N+Sg+Dat: faktõn
     fakt+N+Sg+Ins: faktõks
     fakt+N+Sg+Ill: faktõ
     fakt+N+Sg+Ela: faktõst
     fakt+N+Pl+Nom: faktõd
     fakt+N+Pl+Gen: faktõd
     fakt+N+Pl+Par: faktidi
     fakt+N+Pl+Dat: faktõdõn
     fakt+N+Pl+Ins: faktõdõks
     fakt+N+Pl+Ill: faktiž
     fakt+N+Pl+Ela: faktist
